Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 27.2 The Rhode Island Construction Trust Act

34-27.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Construction Trust Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 288, § 1.

34-27.2-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that the uniqueness of the construction industry requires a special system to ensure that payment is received by those businesses, contractors and owners who expend materials and/or labor prior to the completion of a construction project, but then must wait to be made financially compensated for the materials and/or labor. The general assembly also recognizes that once the materials and labor are placed into the building, or other construction project, it is impossible to reclaim the goods or services so that the only means of compensation is to receive monetary payment. In addition, the general assembly finds that the Comprehensive Bankruptcy Reform Act of 2005 expanded § 523(a) of the Uniform Code of chapter 13, and created a new section known as UC Bankruptcy Code 1328 that gives building material suppliers recourse when a contractor, “commits fraud or defalcation while acting in a fiduciary capacity.” Under the new UC Bankruptcy Code 1328, if any person commits fraud or defalcation while acting in a fiduciary capacity, embezzlement, or larceny the debt is nondischargeable under chapter 7 (liquidation), chapter 11 (adjustment of debt) or chapter 13 (reorganization).

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 288, § 1.

34-27.2-3.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in the interpretations of the provisions of this chapter, unless the context requires another meaning:

“Express Trust” means funds that have been paid by an owner, for or in connection with materials used in an improvement of real property, which are to be held by a contractor or subcontractor, in express trust, for material men. Any such contractor or subcontractor who accepts money from any owner or contractor shall become the trustee of the express trust that is created under this act. The amounts received by such contractor or subcontractor under or in connection with each building project shall be a separate trust and the contractor or subcontractor, or any successor and/or assign of such contractor or subcontractor that hold such trust funds, shall be a trustee thereof. These funds are not required to be held in any separate account by a contractor or subcontractor. Such trust shall be effective against and shall have priority over any interest of a party seeking payment from such contractor or subcontractor for claims other than those that are due and owing by reason of the specific building project for which the trust was created, whether such creditors are foreign attachment or other judicial lien creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy or similar creditors or representatives or creditors of the contractor or subcontractor.

“Material men” means those retailers of lumber who are engaged in the business primarily of selling lumber and building materials to contractors, subcontractors, or repairmen to be used for the construction, erection, alteration, or repairing a building or other structure or in the making of any other improvements on land or the preparation thereof, and whose lumber and building material sales comprise of at least fifty percent (50%) of their total sales as defined in §

44-19-41

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 288, § 1.

34-27.2-4.
Funds held in trust.

Any moneys paid under a contract by an owner to a contractor, or by the owner or contractor to a subcontractor, for work done for or about a building by any subcontractor shall be held in express trust by the contractor or subcontractor, as trustee, for those subcontractors who did work for or about the building, for purposes of paying those subcontractors or any successor and/or assign of such contractor or subcontractor that hold such funds.

Any money paid under a contract by an owner to a contractor, or by the owner or contractor to a subcontractor, for supplies provided by materialmen in contract for the construction, repair, remodeling, improvement or renovation of any building or structure shall be held in an express trust by the contractor or subcontractor for the materialmen or any successor and/or assign of such contractor or subcontractors that holds such trust funds.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as requiring moneys held in express trust by a contractor or subcontractor under subsection (a) or (b) of this section to be placed in a separate account.

The existence of trust funds shall not prohibit the filing or enforcement of a labor, mechanic or material men’s lien against the affected real property by any lien claimant, nor shall the filing of such a lien release the holder of the funds from the obligations created under Rhode Island law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 288, § 1.